Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-111
Burt.

The county of Burt is bounded as follows: Commencing at a point where the north line of sections twenty-one, twenty-two, and twenty-three, township twenty-four, north, range ten, east of the sixth principal meridian intersects the eastern boundary line of the State of Nebraska as established by the Iowa-Nebraska Boundary Compact of 1943; thence west along said section lines to the northwest corner of said section twenty-one; thence south along the west line of said sections twenty-one, twenty-eight, and thirty-three to the south boundary line of Omaha Indian reservation; thence west on the south boundary line of said reservation to the line dividing ranges seven and eight, east; thence south on said line to the south line of township twenty-one, north, range eight, east; thence east on said line to the northeast corner of section six, township twenty, north, range nine, east; thence south on section lines to the southwest corner of section twenty, township twenty, north, range nine, east; thence east by section lines to the eastern boundary line of the State of Nebraska as established by the Iowa-Nebraska Boundary Compact of 1943; and thence northerly along said boundary line to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 5, p. 213;

Laws 1889, c. 4, § 1, p. 73;

R.S.1913, § 824;

C.S.1922, § 726;

C.S.1929, § 25-113;

R.S.1943, § 22-111;

Laws 1955, c. 65, § 1, p. 211.